District of Columbia statutes.
5-203

Equipment; extra compensation.

The members of the United States Park Police force shall be furnished with uniforms, means of transportation, and such other equipment as may be necessary for the proper performance of their duties, including badges, revolvers, and ammunition; the United States Army officer detailed as Superintendent of the United States Park Police, who shall use on official business motor transportation furnished and maintained by himself, shall receive an extra compensation of not to exceed $480 per annum. Members detailed to motorcycle service shall each receive an extra compensation of $120 per annum.

History

May 27, 1924, 43 Stat. 175, ch. 199, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-203.
1973 Ed., § 4-204.

Editor's Notes

Appropriations for uniforms or allowances: Section 105 of Pub. L. 105-83, 111 Stat. 1561, provided that appropriations available to the Department of the Interior for salaries and expenses shall be available for uniforms or allowances therefor, as authorized by this section.